Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF415.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2115SS (4) 91 as/js S.F. 415 Section 1. Section 718.6, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. A person who reports or causes to be reported false 3 information to a fire department, a law enforcement authority, 4 or other public safety entity, knowing that the information is 5 false, or who reports the alleged occurrence of a criminal act, 6 knowing the act did not occur, commits a class âDâ felony if 7 the alleged criminal act reported is any of the following: 8 a. A forcible felony under section 702.11 . 9 b. Intimidation with a dangerous weapon under section 708.6 . 10 c. An act of terrorism under chapter 708A . 11 d. Unlawful possession of biological agents or diseases 12 under chapter 708B . 13 e. Any offense under chapter 712 . 14 b. Any person who continues to make allegations of an 15 alleged occurrence of a criminal act after the allegations are 16 proven to be false may be charged with malicious prosecution 17 under section 720.6. 18 Sec. 2. Section 720.6, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 720.6 Malicious prosecution. 21 A person who causes or attempts to cause another to be 22 indicted or prosecuted for any public offense, having no 23 reasonable grounds for believing that the person committed the 24 offense commits a serious an aggravated misdemeanor. 25